Tennessee, session 114, HB2484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-304, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(d) Each elementary and secondary school shall post the toll-free telephone
number operated by the department of children's services to receive reports of child
abuse or neglect in a conspicuous location on the school's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2484
012093
- 1 -